Illinois, session 104th, HB4056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Reference to Act. This Act may be referred to as 5the Sara Lynn Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 7adding Section 5-5.01c as follows: 8    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01c new)9    Sec. 5-5.01c. Seniors Deserve Dignity Program; 10supplemental personal needs payments. Subject to 11appropriation, the Department shall establish and administer a 12Seniors Deserve Dignity Program that provides monthly 13supplemental personal needs payments to persons residing in 14supportive living facilities authorized under Section 5-5.01a 15who receive medical assistance under this Article and a 16personal needs allowance as specified in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 17146.225(c). Beginning July 1, 2025 through June 30, 2026, a 18qualifying person shall receive a monthly supplemental 19personal needs payment in the amount of $30 so that the 20person's total monthly personal needs allowance is no less 21than $120. The monthly supplemental personal needs payments 22provided under the program shall not be considered income for   HB4056- 2 -LRB104 13669 KTG 26330 b1purposes of determining eligibility or the amount of 2assistance for any public aid benefit provided under State 3law. The Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement 4the program.5    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index-U" means 6the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 7United States Department of Labor that measures the average 8change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 9consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 10100.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.